Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Neut_Retroflex2.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL
LEXICON Root
NounNeutRetroflexStem;

LEXICON NounNeutRetroflex

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+SG+NOM: #;
+N+RT+SG+ACC: #;
+N+RT+SG+VOC: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:ත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:ත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:යි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:යි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:ක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:ක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:කුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:කුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:කි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:කි #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM:වල් #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC:වල් #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC:වල් #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:වලුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:වලුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:වලුයි #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:වලුයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT:ෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:ෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+CJ:ෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:ෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+FN:ෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:ෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT:ින් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+CJ:ිනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+FN:ිනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT:කින් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:කින් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT+CJ:කිනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:කිනුත් #:
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT+FN:කිනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:කිනි #;
+N+RT+PL+INT:වලින් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL:වලින් #;
+N+RT+PL+INT+CJ:වලිනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:වලිනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+INT+FN:වලිනි #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:වලිනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:ට #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:ටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:ටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:කට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:කටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:කටයි #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT:වලට #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:වලටත් #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:වලටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ේ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:ෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:ෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:ෙයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:ක #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC:ක #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:කත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC+CJ:කත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:කයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC+FN:කයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN:වල #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC:වල #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:වලත් #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC+CJ:වලත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:වලයි #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC+FN:වලයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC:ෙහි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC+CJ:ෙහිත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC+FN:ෙහියි #;

LEXICON NounNeutRetroflexStem 
අඟණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
අටවක	NounNeutRetroflex;
අණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
අතරතුර	NounNeutRetroflex;
අතුරුපස	NounNeutRetroflex;
අද්දර	NounNeutRetroflex;
අපරදිග	NounNeutRetroflex;
අභිනය	NounNeutRetroflex;
අරපිරිමැස්ම	NounNeutRetroflex;
අවරගිර	NounNeutRetroflex;
ආයුෂ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඇඟ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඇද	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඉඟ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඉණිමග	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඉව	NounNeutRetroflex;
උච්චාරණේන්ද්‍රිය	NounNeutRetroflex;
උදෑසන	NounNeutRetroflex;
උස	NounNeutRetroflex;
එක්වර	NounNeutRetroflex;
එදා	NounNeutRetroflex;
එවර	NounNeutRetroflex;
කට	NounNeutRetroflex;
කතන්දර	NounNeutRetroflex;
කනත්ත	NounNeutRetroflex;
කම්බුල්ගාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
කලඳ	NounNeutRetroflex;
කළුවර	NounNeutRetroflex;
කැල්ම	NounNeutRetroflex;
කිසිවිට	NounNeutRetroflex;
කුළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
කෙළිදෙළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගංතෙර	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගහ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගිලන්පස	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගෙදරදොර	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගොවිපළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ජය	NounNeutRetroflex;
ටැඹ	NounNeutRetroflex;
තණකොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
තාලම්පට	NounNeutRetroflex;
තිප්පොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
තුරුලිය	NounNeutRetroflex;
තෙසතිය	NounNeutRetroflex;
දකුණුපස	NounNeutRetroflex;
දර	NounNeutRetroflex;
දිග්විජය	NounNeutRetroflex;
දියර	NounNeutRetroflex;
දුම්රියපොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දෙකහමාර	NounNeutRetroflex;
දෙණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දෙපිළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දෙරණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දේපළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ධෛර්ය	NounNeutRetroflex;
නද	NounNeutRetroflex;
නාගදරණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
නැණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
නිකිණි	NounNeutRetroflex;
නියර	NounNeutRetroflex;
නුවණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
පංචේන්ද්‍රිය	NounNeutRetroflex;
පතුළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
පලිහ	NounNeutRetroflex;
පහස	NounNeutRetroflex;
පාට	NounNeutRetroflex;
පැහැය	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිට	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිඬ	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිරිකර	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිරිවෙන	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිළියෙළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
පුක	NounNeutRetroflex;
පෙරහර	NounNeutRetroflex;
පෙළහර	NounNeutRetroflex;
පොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
බණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
බර	NounNeutRetroflex;
බාණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
බිනර	NounNeutRetroflex;
භය	NounNeutRetroflex;
මඟ	NounNeutRetroflex;
මද	NounNeutRetroflex;
මඳ	NounNeutRetroflex;
මහපොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
මැදපෙරදිග	NounNeutRetroflex;
මිණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
මිහිපිට	NounNeutRetroflex;
මුරපොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
මුවදොර	NounNeutRetroflex;
මෙතෙර	NounNeutRetroflex;
මෙහෙණවර	NounNeutRetroflex;
මොහොත	NounNeutRetroflex;
යාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
රට	NounNeutRetroflex;
රස	NounNeutRetroflex;
රළපහර	NounNeutRetroflex;
රිය	NounNeutRetroflex;
ලෙඩ	NounNeutRetroflex;
වතගොත	NounNeutRetroflex;
වර	NounNeutRetroflex;
වස	NounNeutRetroflex;
වළල්ල	NounNeutRetroflex;
වැඩපළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
වැල්පට	NounNeutRetroflex;
විදුලකර	NounNeutRetroflex;
විනිස	NounNeutRetroflex;
විස	NounNeutRetroflex;
වෙහෙස	NounNeutRetroflex;
වේල්පට	NounNeutRetroflex;
සඟසරණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
සඳුදා	NounNeutRetroflex;
සමය	NounNeutRetroflex;
සහය	NounNeutRetroflex;
ස්වකැමැත්ත	NounNeutRetroflex;
සැණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
සිංහලකම	NounNeutRetroflex;
සියලඟ	NounNeutRetroflex;
සිහලසමය	NounNeutRetroflex;
සුවඳ	NounNeutRetroflex;
සෙය	NounNeutRetroflex;
සොඬ	NounNeutRetroflex;
හනස්ස	NounNeutRetroflex;
හසර	NounNeutRetroflex;
හික්මීම	NounNeutRetroflex;
හිරු	NounNeutRetroflex;
හුළඟ	NounNeutRetroflex;
හොඬ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ළය	NounNeutRetroflex;
කරලම	NounNeutRetroflex;
මෙහෙයවම	NounNeutRetroflex;
අක්යාල	NounNeutRetroflex;
අතුපතර	NounNeutRetroflex;
අනෙක්පස	NounNeutRetroflex;
ආවාටවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඈෂ්	NounNeutRetroflex;
එකලෙස	NounNeutRetroflex;
එදාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඒතුල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඔවුනතර	NounNeutRetroflex;
කනිසම	NounNeutRetroflex;
කලමනාකාර	NounNeutRetroflex;
කාළඹ	NounNeutRetroflex;
කිතුගොස	NounNeutRetroflex;
කොටගල	NounNeutRetroflex;
කොලනිවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගත්තාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගම්පල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගාලුමුවදොර	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගොක්කොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
චිත්රීවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඥාතීන්වෙත	NounNeutRetroflex;
තලාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
තියෙනදේ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දසත	NounNeutRetroflex;
දියවළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දුන්නාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
දෙසම	NounNeutRetroflex;
නැගනෙහිර	NounNeutRetroflex;
නිමේශයක	NounNeutRetroflex;
නොසැළකිළිමත්කම	NounNeutRetroflex;
පල්ලේගම	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිළවෙල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ප්‍රගත	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඵලවැල	NounNeutRetroflex;
බදුබර	NounNeutRetroflex;
බැලුම්ගල	NounNeutRetroflex;
භාගෙක	NounNeutRetroflex;
මන්නාපිහියක	NounNeutRetroflex;
මහපල්ලේගම	NounNeutRetroflex;
මාවතගම	NounNeutRetroflex;
මෙතුළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
මොලොව	NounNeutRetroflex;
යාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
රෙදිකැබැල්ලක	NounNeutRetroflex;
වඩුගෙදර	NounNeutRetroflex;
වර්තාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
වැඩපොල	NounNeutRetroflex;
විද්‍යාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
වුනාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
වෙහෙරගල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ෂස	NounNeutRetroflex;
සඳමතුපිට	NounNeutRetroflex;
සිව්ගුණයක	NounNeutRetroflex;
සුරාමත	NounNeutRetroflex;
ෆය	NounNeutRetroflex;
හමුවුණාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
හීනෙක	NounNeutRetroflex;
හොරාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
වදනන	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගොස	NounNeutRetroflex;
සමදුර	NounNeutRetroflex;
කාර්වල	NounNeutRetroflex;
සංඛ්‍යාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
අලසකම	NounNeutRetroflex;
කසල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගිනිගොඩ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දැනුවත්කම	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිහිපහර	NounNeutRetroflex;
ෂජහල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගසම	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඇවිස්ස	NounNeutRetroflex;
නැවැතුම්පළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
මනුෂ්‍යකම	NounNeutRetroflex;
ලැම	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඇළදොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
නාභිදුර	NounNeutRetroflex;
අනුපිළිවෙළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
යටිපෙළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
අසළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
පෙට්ටගම	NounNeutRetroflex;
අතෙක	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඇඳන්වල	NounNeutRetroflex;
උඩුගම්පල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඒකකවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
කරමත	NounNeutRetroflex;
කොටවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගබඩාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගැටවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගුරුගෙදර	NounNeutRetroflex;
තත්වවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
තොප්පිගල	NounNeutRetroflex;
දියපහර	NounNeutRetroflex;
දෙවිනුවර	NounNeutRetroflex;
ධාරාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
නිරිතදිග	NounNeutRetroflex;
පහරවල්වල	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිටිපස	NounNeutRetroflex;
පොළවල්වල	NounNeutRetroflex;
බණ්ඩාරවෙල	NounNeutRetroflex;
බලවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
බෝගම්බර	NounNeutRetroflex;
මිනුවන්ගොඩ	NounNeutRetroflex;
මුවග	NounNeutRetroflex;
යක්කල	NounNeutRetroflex;
රසකලස	NounNeutRetroflex;
ලබම	NounNeutRetroflex;
වම්පස	NounNeutRetroflex;
වාරියපොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
වෙදනලාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ශාඛාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
සම්බන්ධතාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
සීනිවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ස්ථාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
හානිවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
නුදුර	NounNeutRetroflex;
කතර	NounNeutRetroflex;
අපරදිග	NounNeutRetroflex;
කහපාට	NounNeutRetroflex;
දනහිස	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිලිවෙළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගම්පියස	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගෙල	NounNeutRetroflex;
අල්ලම	NounNeutRetroflex;
මටිටම	NounNeutRetroflex;
දිළිදුකම	NounNeutRetroflex;
හරිම	NounNeutRetroflex;
බිම්මට්ටම	NounNeutRetroflex;
දෙපය	NounNeutRetroflex;
පඩිපෙළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
කම්වල	NounNeutRetroflex;
යාත්‍රාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඩෙස්	NounNeutRetroflex;
හිඳ	NounNeutRetroflex;
නැවතුම්පොළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
කෙලවර	NounNeutRetroflex;
බස්නැවතුම්පල	NounNeutRetroflex;
සෙවණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දොර	NounNeutRetroflex;
සෙනෙහස	NounNeutRetroflex;
මුහුණුවර	NounNeutRetroflex;
වැටහ	NounNeutRetroflex;
හාත්පස	NounNeutRetroflex;
පෙවෙත	NounNeutRetroflex;
කතාබහ	NounNeutRetroflex;
අසමත්කම	NounNeutRetroflex;
හොඬ	NounNeutRetroflex;
පසුපස	NounNeutRetroflex;
මැදමුලන	NounNeutRetroflex;
පිළිවෙළ	NounNeutRetroflex;
උස	NounNeutRetroflex;
හුස්ම	NounNeutRetroflex;
මහව	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඇළවල්වල	NounNeutRetroflex;
බාර්ලි	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගැබ	NounNeutRetroflex;
පාමුල	NounNeutRetroflex;
මැද	NounNeutRetroflex;
කේ	NounNeutRetroflex;
සූදානම	NounNeutRetroflex;
හඳ	NounNeutRetroflex;
නොකරම	NounNeutRetroflex;
බැංකුවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
දේපල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ගෙය	NounNeutRetroflex;
වැරද	NounNeutRetroflex;
එපමණ	NounNeutRetroflex;
දෙපස	NounNeutRetroflex;
පොහොර	NounNeutRetroflex;
සාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
නැගෙනහිර	NounNeutRetroflex;
ක්‍රමෝපාය	NounNeutRetroflex;
ණය	NounNeutRetroflex;
සජ	NounNeutRetroflex;
අහ	NounNeutRetroflex;
වවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ක්‍රියාවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
බය	NounNeutRetroflex;
මය	NounNeutRetroflex;
අවංකකම	NounNeutRetroflex;
එවල	NounNeutRetroflex;
කුම	NounNeutRetroflex;
තුල	NounNeutRetroflex;
පල	NounNeutRetroflex;
ඉස්සරහ	NounNeutRetroflex;
